Georgia, session 2025_26, HB721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 4 of Article 3 of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to ride share network services and transportation referral services, is amended in
subsection (d) of Code Section 40-1-192, relating to transportation referral service provider
registration requirement, licensure, exemptions, and additional requirements, by deleting
"and" at the end of paragraph (9), replacing the period with "; and" at the end of paragraph
(10), and adding three new paragraphs to read as follows:
"(11) Provide a manner for informing a driver utilized by such transportation referral
service provider whether the location where such driver is to provide services has a violent
H. B. 721
- 1 -

LC 39 4715
crime rate greater than the current national average based upon statistics compiled by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting Program;
(12) Ensure security and privacy of personal information collected for drivers and
passengers; and
(13) Provide for a grievance process for any driver utilized by such transportation referral
service provider."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended in subsection (c) of Code Section 40-1-193, relating to ride
share network service registration requirement, licensure, list of ride share drivers, additional
requirements and law enforcement access to smartphone of ride share driver, by deleting
"and" at the end of paragraph (4), replacing the period with "; and" at the end of paragraph
(5), and adding three new paragraphs to read as follows:
"(6) Provide a manner for informing a driver utilized by such ride share network service
whether the location where such driver is to provide services has a violent crime rate
greater than the current national average based upon statistics compiled by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting Program;
(7) Ensure security and privacy of personal information collected for drivers and
passengers; and
(8) Provide for a grievance process for any driver utilized by such ride share network
service."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 721
- 2 -